es: Herramientas incluidas en el kit: Telar de abalorios; Organizador/estuche de abalorios; Bandeja de abalorios; Aguja(s) para abalorios; Herramienta de engarzado; Folleto de instrucciones; Cinta métrica/regla; Alicates; Tijeras; Pinzas; Otras
zh-CN: 套装内含工具: 串珠织机; 串珠收纳盒; 串珠盘; 串珠针; 压接工具; 说明手册; 卷尺/直尺; 钳子; 剪刀; 镊子; 其他
nl: Kit meegeleverde tools: Kralenweefgetouw; Kralenorganizer/koffer; Kralenbord; Kralennaald(en); Krimptang; Instructieboekje; Meetlint/liniaal; Tang; Schaar; Pincet; Anders
ja: Kit工具付き: ビーズ織り機; ビーズオーガナイザー/ケース; ビーズトレイ; ビーズ針; 圧着工具; 取扱説明書; メジャー/定規; プライヤー; はさみ; ピンセット; その他
tr: Kitte yer alan araçları belirtir.: Boncuk dokuma tezgahı; Boncuk düzenleyici/kutu; Boncuk tepsisi; Boncuk iğneleri; Kıvırma aleti; Talimat kitapçığı; Mezura/cetvel; Pense; Makas; Cımbız; Diğer
cs: Nástroje v sadě: Tkalcovský stav na korálky; Organizér/pouzdro na korálky; Podložka na korálky; Jehla (jehly) na navlékání korálků; Krimpovací kleště; Brožura s pokyny; Krejčovský metr / pravítko; Kleště; Nůžky; Pinzeta; Jiné
en: Kit tools included: Bead loom; Bead organizer/case; Bead tray; Beading needle(s); Crimping tool; Instruction booklet; Measuring tape/ruler; Pliers; Scissors; Tweezers; Other
da: Inkluderede sætværktøjer: Perlevæv; Perleopbevaring/-æske; Perlebakke; Perlenål(e); Krympeværktøj; Instruktionshæfte; Målebånd/lineal; Tang; Saks; Pincet; Andet
nb: Verktøy inkludert i settet: Perlevev; Perlesorterer/etui; Perlebrett; Perlenål(er); Krympeverktøy; Instruksjonshefte; Målebånd/linjal; Tang; Saks; Pinsett; Annet
ro-RO: Unelte incluse în kit: Război de mărgele; Organizator/Cutie pentru mărgele; Tavă pentru mărgele; Ac(e) pentru mărgele; Clește de sertizat; Broșură cu instrucțiuni; Ruletă/riglă; Clește; Foarfece; Pensete; Altele
pt-BR: Ferramentas incluídas no kit: Tear de miçangas; Organizador/estojo de miçangas; Bandeja para miçangas; Agulha(s) para miçangas; Ferramenta de crimpagem; Livreto de instruções; Fita métrica/régua; Alicate; Tesoura; Pinça; Outras
bg-BG: Включени инструменти в комплекта: Стан за мъниста; Органайзер/кутия за мъниста; Табла за мъниста; Игла(и) за низане на мъниста; Клещи за кримпване; Брошура с инструкции; Измервателна лента/линия; Клещи; Ножици; Пинсети; Друго
ru: Инструменты в комплекте набора: Станок для бисероплетения; Органайзер/футляр для бисера; Лоток для бисера; Иглы для бисероплетения; Кримпер; Буклет с инструкцией; Мерная лента/линейка; Плоскогубцы; Ножницы; Пинцет; Другое
pl: Narzędzia dołączone do zestawu: Krosno do koralików; Organizer/etui na koraliki; Tacka na koraliki; Igły do koralików; Zaciskarka; Broszura z instrukcją; Miarka/linijka; Szczypce; Nożyczki; Pęseta; Inne
sv: Verktyg som ingår i kit: Pärlväv; Pärlförvaring/låda; Pärlbricka; Pärlnålar; Klämverktyg; Instruktionshäfte; Måttband/linjal; Tång; Sax; Pincett; Övrigt
zh-TW: 套件隨附工具: 串珠織機; 串珠收納盒; 串珠盤; 串珠針; 壓接鉗; 說明書手冊; 捲尺/直尺; 鉗子; 剪刀; 鑷子; 其他
hu: A készlethez mellékelt eszközök: Gyöngyszövő keret; Gyöngyrendszerező / tok; Gyöngytálca; Gyöngyfűző tű(k); Krimpelő fogó; Használati útmutató; Mérőszalag / vonalzó; Fogó; Olló; Csipesz; Egyéb
fr: Outils inclus dans le kit: Métier à tisser les perles; Boîte/organiseur de perles; Plateau pour perles; Aiguille(s) à perles; Pince à sertir; Livret d’instructions; Mètre ruban/règle; Pinces; Ciseaux; Pincettes; Autre
sk-SK: Súprava nástrojov v balení: Stav na koráliky; Organizér/puzdro na koráliky; Podnos na koráliky; Ihla(y) na koráliky; Krimpovacie kliešte; Brožúra s pokynmi; Krajčírsky meter/pravítko; Kliešte; Nožnice; Pinzeta; Iné
lt-LT: Įtraukti rinkinio įrankiai: Karoliukų audimo staklės; Karoliukų dėžutė / dėklas; Karoliukų padėklas; Adata (-os) karoliukams verti; Suspaudimo replės; Instrukcijų knygelė; Matavimo juosta / liniuotė; Replės; Žirklės; Pincetas; Kita
de: Im Kit enthaltene Werkzeuge: Perlenwebrahmen; Perlen-Organizer/Box; Perlentablett; Perlennadel(n); Crimpzange; Anleitungsheft; Maßband/Lineal; Zange; Schere; Pinzette; Sonstige
pt-PT: Ferramentas incluídas no kit: Tear de missangas; Organizador/estojo de missangas; Bandeja de missangas; Agulha(s) de missangas; Alicate de cravar; Livrete de instruções; Fita métrica/régua; Alicate; Tesoura; Pinça; Outro
el: Περιλαμβανόμενα εργαλεία κιτ: Αργαλειός χαντρών; Κουτί οργάνωσης/θήκη χαντρών; Δίσκος χαντρών; Βελόνα(-ες) χαντρών; Εργαλείο πτύχωσης; Βιβλίο οδηγιών; Μεζούρα/χάρακας; Πένσα; Ψαλίδι; Τσιμπιδάκι; Άλλο
hr-HR: Alati uključeni u komplet: Tkalački stan za perlice; Organizator/kutija za perlice; Pladanj za perlice; Igle za nizanje perlica; Kliješta za krimpanje; Knjižica s uputama; Metar/ravnalo; Kliješta; Škare; Pinceta; Ostalo
th: เครื่องมือ Kit ประกอบด้วย: กี่ทอลูกปัด; กล่องจัดระเบียบลูกปัด/เคส; ถาดร้อยลูกปัด; เข็มร้อยลูกปัด; คีมย้ำ; คู่มือการใช้งาน; สายวัด/ไม้บรรทัด; คีม; กรรไกร; แหนบ; อื่นๆ
sl-SI: Vključena orodja v kompletu: Statve za perlice; Organizator/etui za perlice; Pladenj za perlice; Igle za nizanje perlic; Klešče za stiskanje; Knjižica z navodili; Merilni trak/ravnilo; Klešče; Škarje; Pinceta; Drugo
vi: Bộ dụng cụ bao gồm: Khung dệt hạt cườm; Hộp/khay đựng hạt cườm; Khay phân loại hạt cườm; (Các) kim xâu hạt cườm; Kìm bóp hạt chốt; Sổ tay hướng dẫn; Thước dây/thước kẻ; Kìm; Kéo; Nhíp; Khác
it: Attrezzi del kit inclusi: Telaio per perline; Organizer/scatola per perline; Vassoio per perline; Ago/i per perline; Pinza crimpatrice; Libretto di istruzioni; Metro a nastro/righello; Pinze; Forbici; Pinzette; Altro
ko: 포함된 키트 도구: 비즈 베틀; 비즈 정리함/케이스; 비즈 트레이; 비딩 바늘; 크림핑 도구; 사용 설명서; 줄자/자; 플라이어; 가위; 핀셋; 기타
fi: Sarjan mukana tulevat työkalut: Helmikangaspuut; Helmilokerikko/rasia; Helmitarjotin; Helmineula(t); Puristuspihdit; Ohjekirja; Mittanauha/viivain; Pihdit; Sakset; Pinsetit; Muu